Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5177XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 2042 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 327D.30 Idling near residential 1 zones. 2 A railway corporation shall not leave a stationary railroad 3 trainâs engines running for more than one hour if the train 4 is stationary within one-half mile of an area zoned for 5 residential purposes in a city. 6